Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVII Economic Security and Public Welfare
Assisted-Living Communities

194A.700.
Definitions for KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

As used in KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729:

“Activities of daily living” means normal daily activities, including bathing, dressing, grooming, transferring, toileting, and eating;

“Assistance with activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living” means any assistance provided by the assisted-living community staff with the client having at least minimal ability to verbally direct or physically participate in the activity with which assistance is being provided;

“Assistance with self-administration of medication,” unless subject to more restrictive provisions in an assisted-living community’s policies that are communicated in writing to clients and prospective clients, means:

Assistance with medication that is prepared or directed by the client, the client’s designated representative, or a licensed health care professional who is not the owner, manager, or employee of the assisted-living community. The medication shall:

Except for ointments, be preset in a medication organizer or be in a single dose unit;

Include the client’s name on the medication organizer or container in which the single dose unit is stored; and

Be stored in a manner requested in writing by the client or the client’s designated representative and permitted by the assisted-living community’s policies;

Assistance by an assisted-living community staff person, which includes:

Reminding a client when to take medications and observing to ensure that the client takes the medication as directed;

Handing the client’s medication to the client, or if it is difficult for the client or the client requests assistance, opening the unit dose or medication organizer, removing the medication from a medication organizer or unit dose container, closing the medication organizer for the client, placing the dose in a container, and placing the medication or the container in the clients hand;

Steadying or guiding a client’s hand while the client is self-administering medications; or

Applying over-the-counter topical ointments and lotions;

Making available the means of communication by telephone, facsimile, or other electronic device with a licensed health care professional and pharmacy regarding a prescription for medication;

At the request of the client or the client’s designated representative, facilitating the filling of a preset medication container by a designated representative or licensed health care professional who is not the owner, manager, or employee of the assisted living community; and

None of the following:

Instilling eye, ear, or nasal drops;

Mixing compounding, converting, or calculating medication doses;

Preparing syringes for injection or administering medications by any injection method;

Administrating medications through intermittent positive pressure breathing machines or a nebulizer;

Administrating medications by way of a tube inserted in a cavity of the body;

Administrating parenteral preparations;

Administrating irrigations or debriding agents used in the treatment of a skin condition; or

Administrating rectal, urethral, or vaginal preparations;

“Assisted-living community” means a series of living units on the same site certified under KRS 194A.707 to provide services for five (5) or more adult persons not related within the third degree of consanguinity to the owner or manager;

“Client,” “resident,” or “tenant” means an adult person who has entered into a lease agreement with an assisted-living community;

“Danger” means physical harm or threat of physical harm to one’s self or others;

“Department” means the Department for Aging and Independent Living;

“Health services” has the same meaning as in KRS 216B.015;

“Instrumental activities of daily living” means activities to support independent living including but not limited to housekeeping, shopping, laundry, chores, transportation, and clerical assistance;

“Living unit” means a portion of an assisted-living community occupied as the living quarters of a client under a lease agreement;

“Mobile nonambulatory” means unable to walk without assistance, but able to move from place to place with the use of a device including but not limited to a walker, crutches, or wheelchair;

“Plan of correction” means a written response from the assisted-living community addressing an instance cited in the statement of noncompliance;

“Statement of danger” means a written statement issued by the department detailing an instance where a client is a danger; and

“Statement of noncompliance” means a written statement issued by the department detailing an instance when the department considers the assisted-living community to have been in violation of a statutory or regulatory requirement.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 161, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 7, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 1, effective July 15, 2010.

194A.700.
Definitions for KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

As used in KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729:

“Activities of daily living” means normal daily activities, including but not limited to bathing, dressing, grooming, transferring, toileting, and eating;

“Ambulatory” means able to walk, transfer, or move from place to place with or without hands-on assistance of another person, and with or without an assistive device, including but not limited to a walker or a wheelchair;

“Assistance with activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living” means any assistance provided by the assisted living community staff with the resident having at least minimal ability to verbally direct or physically participate in the activity with which assistance is being provided;

“Assistance with self-administration of medication,” unless subject to more restrictive provisions in an assisted living community’s policies that are communicated in writing to residents and prospective residents, means:

Assistance with medication that is prepared or directed by the resident, the resident’s designated representative, or a licensed health care professional who is not the owner, manager, or employee of the assisted living community. The medication shall:

Except for ointments, be preset in a medication organizer or be in a single dose unit;

Include the resident’s name on the medication organizer or container in which the single dose unit is stored; and

Be stored in a manner requested in writing by the resident or the resident’s designated representative and permitted by the assisted living community’s policies;

Assistance by an assisted living community staff person, which includes:

Reminding a resident when to take medications and observing to ensure that the resident takes the medication as directed;

Handing the resident’s medication to the resident, or if it is difficult for the resident or the resident requests assistance, opening the unit dose or medication organizer, removing the medication from a medication organizer or unit dose container, closing the medication organizer for the resident, placing the dose in a container, and placing the medication or the container in the resident’s hand;

Steadying or guiding a resident’s hand while the resident is self-administering medications; or

Applying over-the-counter topical ointments and lotions;

Making available the means of communication by telephone, facsimile, computer, or other electronic device with a licensed health care professional and pharmacy regarding a prescription for medication;

At the request of the resident or the resident’s designated representative, facilitating the filling of a preset medication container by a designated representative or licensed health care professional who is not the owner, manager, or employee of the assisted living community; and

None of the following:

Instilling eye, ear, or nasal drops;

Mixing compounding, converting, or calculating medication doses;

Preparing syringes for injection or administering medications by any injection method;

Administrating medications through intermittent positive pressure breathing machines or a nebulizer;

Administrating medications by way of a tube inserted in a cavity of the body;

Administrating parenteral preparations;

Administrating irrigations or debriding agents used in the treatment of a skin condition; or

Administrating rectal, urethral, or vaginal preparations;

“Assisted living community” means a licensed facility that provides sleeping accommodations and assisted living services set forth in the assisted living community’s lease and policies for five (5) or more adult persons not related within the third degree of consanguinity to the owner or manager;

“Assisted living community with dementia care” means an assisted living community that is advertised, marketed, or otherwise promoted as providing specialized care for individuals with Alzheimer’s disease or other dementia illnesses and disorders. An assisted living community with a secured dementia care unit shall be licensed as an assisted living community with dementia care;

“Assisted living services” means one (1) or more of the following services:

Assisting with activities of daily living, including but not limited to bathing, dressing, grooming, transferring, toileting, and eating;

Assisting with instrumental activities of daily living that support independent living, including but not limited to housekeeping, shopping, laundry, chores, transportation, and clerical assistance;

Providing standby assistance;

Providing verbal or visual reminders to the resident to take regularly scheduled medication, including bringing the resident previously set up medication, medication in original containers, or liquid or food to accompany the medication;

Providing verbal or visual reminders to the resident to perform regularly scheduled treatments and exercises;

Preparing and serving three (3) meals per day consisting of regular or modified diets ordered by a licensed health professional;

Providing the services of an advanced practice registered nurse, registered nurse, licensed practical nurse, physical therapist, respiratory therapist, occupational therapist, speech pathologist, dietitian or nutritionist, or social worker;

Tasks delegated to unlicensed personnel by a registered nurse or assigned by a licensed health professional within the person’s scope of practice;

Assistance with self-administration of medication;

Medication management;

Hands-on assistance with transfers and mobility, including use of gait belts;

Treatments and therapies;

Assisting residents with eating when the residents have complicated eating problems such as difficulty swallowing or recurrent lung aspirations as identified in the resident record or through an assessment;

Scheduled daily social activities that address the general preferences of residents; and

Other basic health and health-related services;

“Basic health and health-related services” means:

Monitoring and providing for the resident’s health care needs;

Storage and control of medications, other than as requested by a resident or a resident’s designated representative;

Administration of medications; and

Arranging for therapeutic services ordered by the resident’s health care practitioner, if the services are not available in the assisted living community;

“Cabinet” means the Cabinet for Health and Family Services;

“Dementia” means the loss of cognitive function, including the ability to think, remember, problem solve, or reason, of sufficient severity to interfere with an individual’s daily functioning;

“Dementia care services” means ongoing care for behavioral and psychological symptoms of dementia, including but not limited to planned group and individual programming and person-centered care practices to support daily living activities for people living with dementia;

“Dementia-trained staff” means any employee who has completed the minimum training required by Section 21 of this Act and has demonstrated knowledge and the ability to support individuals with dementia;

“Hands-on assistance” means physical help by another person without which the resident is not able to perform the activity;

“Health services” has the same meaning as in KRS 216B.015;

“Instrumental activities of daily living” means activities to support independent living including but not limited to housekeeping, shopping, laundry, chores, transportation, and clerical assistance;

“Living unit” means a portion of an assisted living community occupied as the living quarters of a resident under a lease agreement;

“Medication administration” means:

Checking the resident’s medication record;

Preparing the medication as necessary;

Administering the medication to the resident;

Documenting the administration or reason for not administering the medication; and

Reporting to a nurse or appropriate licensed health professional any concerns about the medication, the resident, or the resident’s refusal to take the medication;

“Medication management” means the provision of any of the following medication-related services to a resident:

Performing medication setup;

Administering medications;

Storing and securing medications;

Documenting medication activities;

Verifying and monitoring the effectiveness of systems to ensure safe handling and administration;

Coordinating refills;

Handling and implementing changes to prescriptions;

Communicating with the pharmacy about the resident’s medications; and

Coordinating and communicating with the prescriber;

“Medication setup” means arranging medications by a nurse, pharmacy, or authorized prescriber for later administration by the resident or by facility staff;

“Nonambulatory” means unable to walk, transfer, or move from place to place with or without hands-on assistance of another person, and with or without an assistive device, including but not limited to a walker or a wheelchair;

“Person-centered care” means respecting and valuing the individual, providing individualized care that reflects the individual’s changing needs, understanding the perspective of the person, and providing supportive opportunities for social engagement;

“Resident” means an adult person who has entered into a lease agreement with an assisted living community;

“Secured dementia care unit” means a designated area or setting designed for individuals with dementia that is secured in compliance with the applicable life safety code to prevent or to limit a resident’s ability to exit the secured area or setting. A secured dementia care unit is not solely an individual resident’s living area;

“Service plan” means the written plan agreement between the resident and the licensee about services that will be provided to the resident;

“Standby assistance” means minimizing the risk of injury to a resident who is performing daily activities by a person who is within arm’s reach providing physical intervention, cueing, or oversight;

“Temporary condition” means a condition that affects a resident as follows:

The resident is not ambulatory before or after entering a lease agreement with the assisted living community but is expected to regain ambulatory ability within six (6) months of loss of ambulation, as documented by a licensed health care professional, and the assisted living community has a written plan in place to mitigate risk; or

The resident is not ambulatory after entering a lease agreement with the assisted living community but is not expected to regain ambulatory ability, hospice services are provided by a hospice program licensed under KRS Chapter 216B or other end-of-life services are provided by a licensed health care provider in accordance with Section 3 of this Act, as documented by a licensed hospice program or other licensed health care professional, and the assisted living community has a written plan in place to mitigate risk; and

“Unlicensed personnel” means individuals not otherwise licensed or certified by a governmental health board or agency who provide services to a resident.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 161, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 7, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 1, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 20, § 1.

194A.703.
Requirements for living units.

Each living unit in an assisted-living community shall:

Be at least two hundred (200) square feet for single occupancy, or for double occupancy if the room is shared with a spouse or another individual by mutual agreement;

Include at least one (1) unfurnished room with a lockable door, private bathroom with a tub or shower, provisions for emergency response, window to the outdoors, and a telephone jack;

Have an individual thermostat control if the assisted-living community has more than twenty (20) units; and

Have temperatures that are not under a client’s direct control at a minimum of seventy-one (71) degrees Fahrenheit in winter conditions and a maximum of eighty-one (81) degrees Fahrenheit in summer conditions if the assisted-living community has twenty (20) or fewer units.

Each client shall be provided access to central dining, a laundry facility, and a central living room.

Each assisted-living community shall comply with applicable building and life safety codes as determined by the building code or life safety code enforcement authority with jurisdiction.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 36, § 2, effective July 15, 2010.

194A.703.
Requirements for living units.

Each living unit in an assisted living community shall:

Be at least two hundred (200) square feet for single occupancy, or for double occupancy if the room is shared with a spouse or another individual by mutual agreement;

Include at least one (1) unfurnished room, a lockable entry door unless in a secured dementia care unit, a private bathroom with a tub or shower, provisions for emergency response, a window to the outdoors, and a telephone jack;

Unless living units are in a secured dementia care unit, have an individual thermostat control if the assisted living community has more than twenty (20) units; and

Have temperatures that are not under a resident’s direct control at a minimum of seventy-one (71) degrees Fahrenheit in winter conditions and a maximum of eighty-one (81) degrees Fahrenheit in summer conditions if the assisted living community has twenty (20) or fewer units, or the living units are in a secured dementia care unit.

Each resident shall be provided access to central dining, a laundry facility, and a central living room.

Each assisted living community shall comply with applicable building and life safety codes as determined by the building code or life safety code enforcement authority with jurisdiction.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 36, § 2, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 20, § 2.

194A.705.
Services to be provided to assisted-living community clients.

The assisted-living community shall provide each client with access to the following services according to the lease agreement:

Assistance with activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living;

Three (3) meals and snacks made available each day;

Scheduled daily social activities that address the general preferences of clients; and

Assistance with self-administration of medication.

Clients of an assisted-living community may arrange for additional services under direct contract or arrangement with an outside agent, professional, provider, or other individual designated by the client if permitted by the policies of the assisted-living community.

Upon entering into a lease agreement, an assisted-living community shall inform the client in writing about policies relating to the contracting or arranging for additional services.

A client issued a move-out notice shall receive the notice in writing and the assisted-living community shall assist each client upon a move-out notice to find appropriate living arrangements. Each assisted-living community shall share information provided from the department regarding options for alternative living arrangements at the time a move-out notice is given to the client.

An assisted-living community shall complete and provide to the client:

Upon move-in, a copy of a functional needs assessment pertaining to the client’s ability to perform activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living; and

After move-in, a copy of an updated functional needs assessment pertaining to the client’s ability to perform activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 162, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 8, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 3, effective July 15, 2010.

194A.705.
Services to be provided to assisted-living community clients.

The assisted living community shall provide each resident with access to the following services according to the lease agreement:

Assistance with activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living;

Three (3) meals and snacks made available each day, with flexibility in a secured dementia care unit to meet the needs of residents with cognitive impairments who may eat outside of scheduled dining hours;

Scheduled daily social activities that address the general preferences of residents;

Assistance with self-administration of medication; and

Housing.

The assisted living community may provide residents with access to basic health and health-related services.
(2) (a)

The assisted living community may provide residents with access to basic health and health-related services.

If an assisted living community chooses to provide basic health and health-related services, the assisted living community shall supervise the residents.

Residents of an assisted living community may arrange for additional services under direct contract or arrangement with an outside agent, professional, provider, or other individual designated by the resident if permitted by the policies of the assisted living community.
(3) (a)

Residents of an assisted living community may arrange for additional services under direct contract or arrangement with an outside agent, professional, provider, or other individual designated by the resident if permitted by the policies of the assisted living community.

Permitted services for which a resident may arrange or contract include but are not limited to health services, hospice services provided by a hospice program licensed under KRS Chapter 216B, and other end-of-life services.

Upon entering into a lease agreement, an assisted living community shall inform the resident in writing about policies relating to the provision of services by the assisted living community and the contracting or arranging for additional services.

A resident issued a move-out notice shall receive the notice in writing and the assisted living community shall assist each resident upon a move-out notice to find appropriate living arrangements. Each assisted living community shall share information provided from the cabinet regarding options for alternative living arrangements at the time a move-out notice is given to the resident.

An assisted living community shall complete and provide to the resident :

Upon move-in, a copy of a functional needs assessment pertaining to the resident’s ability to perform activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living and any other topics the assisted living community determines to be necessary; and

After move-in, a copy of an updated functional needs assessment pertaining to the resident’s ability to perform activities of daily living and instrumental activities of daily living, the service plan designed to meet identified needs, and any other topics the assisted living community determines to be necessary.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 162, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 8, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 3, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 20, § 3.

194A.707.
Certification — Administrative regulations — Accreditation by other organizations — Fees — Compliance.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall establish by the promulgation of administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A, an initial and annual certification review process for assisted-living communities. This administrative regulation shall establish procedures related to applying for, reviewing, and approving, denying, or revoking certification, as well as the conduct of hearings upon appeals as governed by KRS Chapter 13B.

An on-site visit of an assisted-living community shall be conducted by the cabinet:

As part of the initial certification review process;

On a biennial basis as part of the certification review process if during or since the previous certification review an assisted-living community has not received:

Any statement of danger, unless withdrawn by the cabinet; or

A finding substantiated by the cabinet that the assisted-living community delivered a health service; and

Within one (1) year of the date of the previous certification review if during or since the last certification review an assisted-living community has received:

Any statement of danger that was not withdrawn by the cabinet; or

A finding substantiated by the cabinet that the assisted-living community delivered a health service.

No business shall market its service as an assisted-living community unless it has:

Filed a current application for the business to be certified by the department as an assisted-living community; or

Received certification by the department as an assisted-living community.

No business that has been denied or had its certification revoked shall operate or market its service as an assisted-living community unless it has:

Filed a current application for the business to be certified by the department as an assisted-living community; and

Received certification as an assisted-living community from the department. Revocation of certification may be grounds for the department to not reissue certification for one (1) year if ownership remains substantially the same.

No business shall operate as an assisted-living community unless its owner or manager has:

Filed a current application for the business to be certified as an assisted-living community by the department; and

Received certification as an assisted-living community from the department.

By September 1 of each year, each assisted-living community certified pursuant to this chapter may provide residents with educational information or education opportunities on influenza disease.

The department shall determine the feasibility of recognizing accreditation by other organizations in lieu of certification from the department.

Individuals designated by the department to conduct certification reviews shall have the skills, training, experience, and ongoing education to perform certification reviews.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to establish an assisted-living community certification fee that shall not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet, to be assessed upon receipt of an application for certification. The department shall submit a breakdown of fees assessed and costs incurred for conducting certification reviews upon request.

The department shall make findings from certification reviews conducted during the prior twelve (12) months available to any interested person.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the department may request any additional information from an assisted-living community or conduct additional on-site visits to ensure compliance with the provisions of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

Failure to follow an assisted-living community’s policies, practices, and procedures shall not result in a finding of noncompliance unless the assisted-living community is out of compliance with a related requirement under KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 163, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 9, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2016 ch. 103, § 20, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 80, § 30, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 136, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

194A.707.
Certification — Administrative regulations — Accreditation by other organizations — Fees — Compliance.

The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall establish by the promulgation of administrative regulation under KRS Chapter 13A, an initial and re- licensure review process for assisted living communities. This administrative regulation shall establish procedures related to applying for, reviewing, and approving, denying, or revoking licensure, as well as the conduct of hearings upon appeals as governed by KRS Chapter 216b.

Notwithstanding the timeframe in Section 27 of this Act, an on-site visit of an assisted living community shall be conducted by the cabinet:

As part of the initial licensure review process;

Twenty-four (24) months following the date of the previous licensure review, if during the previous licensure review an assisted living community was not found to have violated an administrative regulation set forth by the cabinet that presented imminent danger to a resident that created substantial risk of death or serious mental or physical harm; and

Twelve (12) months following the date of the previous licensure review, if during the previous licensure review an assisted living community was found to have violated an administrative regulation set forth by the cabinet that presented imminent danger to a resident that created substantial risk of death or serious mental or physical harm.

No business shall market its service as an assisted living community unless it has:

Filed a current application for the business to be licensed by the cabinet as an assisted living community; or

Received licensure by the cabinet as an assisted living community.

No business that has been denied or had its license revoked shall operate or market its service as an assisted living community unless it has:

Filed a current application for the business to be licensed by the cabinet as an assisted living community; and

Received licensure as an assisted living community from the cabinet. Revocation of licensure may be grounds for the cabinet to not reissue a license for that property for seven (7) years if ownership remains substantially the same.

No business shall operate as an assisted living community unless its owner or manager has:

Filed a current application for the business to be licensed as an assisted living community by the cabinet; and

Received licensure as an assisted living community from the cabinet.

By September 1 of each year, each assisted living community licensed pursuant to this chapter may provide residents with educational information or education opportunities on influenza disease.

The cabinet shall determine the feasibility of recognizing accreditation by other organizations in lieu of licensure review by the cabinet.

Individuals designated by the cabinet to conduct licensure reviews shall have the skills, training, experience, and ongoing education, including understanding that assisted living is not subject to the rules and regulations of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services, to perform assisted living community and assisted living community with dementia care licensure reviews.

The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations to establish an assisted living community and assisted living community with dementia care licensure fee that shall not exceed costs of the program to the cabinet, to be assessed upon receipt of an application for licensure. The cabinet shall provide a breakdown of fees assessed and costs incurred for conducting licensure reviews upon request of any interested person.

The cabinet shall make findings from the most recent licensure review available to the public.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the cabinet may request additional relevant information from an assisted living community or conduct additional on-site visits to ensure compliance with the provisions of KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729 if the cabinet has reasonable cause to believe that the assisted living community is not in compliance.

Failure to follow an assisted living community’s policies, practices, and procedures shall not result in a finding of noncompliance unless the assisted living community is out of compliance with a related requirement under KRS 194A.700 to 194A.729.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 4, effective July 14, 2000; 2005, ch. 99, § 163, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 9, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 4, effective July 15, 2010; 2016 ch. 103, § 20, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 80, § 30, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 136, § 2, effective July 1, 2019; 2022 ch. 20, § 4.

194A.709.
Delivery of health services by staff — Abuse, neglect, and exploitation of clients, policies and reporting.

The department shall report to the Division of Health Care any alleged or actual cases of health services being delivered by the staff of an assisted-living community.

An assisted-living community shall have written policies on reporting and recordkeeping of alleged or actual cases of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an adult under KRS 209.030. The only requisite components of a recordkeeping policy are the date and time of the report, the reporting method, and a brief summary of the alleged incident.

Any assisted-living community staff member who has reasonable cause to suspect that a client has suffered abuse, neglect, or exploitation shall report the abuse, neglect, or exploitation under KRS 209.030.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 81, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2005, ch. 99, § 164, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 10, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 5, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 158, § 21, effective July 12, 2012.

194A.709.
Delivery of health services by staff — Abuse, neglect, and exploitation of clients, policies and reporting.

An assisted living community shall have written policies on reporting and recordkeeping of alleged or actual cases of abuse, neglect, or exploitation of an adult under KRS 209.030. The only requisite components of a recordkeeping policy are the date and time of the report, the reporting method, and a brief summary of the alleged incident.

Any assisted living community staff member who has reasonable cause to suspect that a resident has suffered abuse, neglect, or exploitation shall report the abuse, neglect, or exploitation under KRS 209.030.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 5, effective July 14, 2000; 2001, ch. 81, § 1, effective June 21, 2001; 2005, ch. 99, § 164, effective June 20, 2005; 2007, ch. 24, § 10, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 36, § 5, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 158, § 21, effective July 12, 2012; 2022 ch. 20, § 5.

194A.711.
Criteria to be met by clients.

A client shall meet the following criteria:

Be ambulatory or mobile nonambulatory, unless due to a temporary condition; and

Not be a danger.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 36, § 6, effective July 15, 2010.

194A.711.
Criteria to be met by clients.

A resident shall be ambulatory, unless due to a temporary condition.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 6, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 36, § 6, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 20, § 6.

194A.713.
Contents of lease agreement.

A lease agreement, in no smaller type than twelve (12) point font, shall be executed by the client and the assisted-living community and shall include but not be limited to:

Client data, for the purpose of providing service, to include:

Emergency contact person’s name;

Name of responsible party or legal guardian, if applicable;

Attending physician’s name;

Information regarding personal preferences and social factors; and

Advance directive under KRS 311.621 to 311.643, if desired by the client.

Assisted-living community’s policy regarding termination of the lease agreement;

Terms of occupancy;

General services and fee structure;

Information regarding specific services provided, description of the living unit, and associated fees;

Provisions for modifying client services and fees;

Minimum thirty (30) day notice provision for a change in the community’s fee structure;

Minimum thirty (30) day move-out notice provision for client nonpayment, subject to applicable landlord or tenant laws;

Provisions for assisting any client that has received a move-out notice to find appropriate living arrangements prior to the actual move-out date;

Refund and cancellation policies;

Description of any special programming, staffing, or training if an assisted-living community is marketed as providing special programming, staffing, or training on behalf of clients with particular needs or conditions;

Other community rights, policies, practices, and procedures;

Other client rights and responsibilities, including compliance with KRS 194A.705(2) and (3); and

Grievance policies that minimally address issues related to confidentiality of complaints and the process for resolving grievances between the client and the assisted-living community.

History.
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 36, § 7, effective July 15, 2010.

194A.713.
Contents of lease agreement.

A lease agreement, in no smaller type than twelve (12) point font, shall be executed by the resident and the assisted living community and shall include but not be limited to:

Resident data, for the purpose of providing service, to include:

Emergency contact person’s name;

Name of responsible party or legal guardian, if applicable;

Attending physician’s name;

Information regarding personal preferences and social factors; and

Advance directive under KRS 311.621 to 311.643, if desired by the resident;

Assisted living community’s policy regarding termination of the lease agreement;

Terms of occupancy;

General services and fee structure;

Information regarding specific services provided, description of the living unit, and associated fees;

Provisions for modifying resident services and fees;

Minimum thirty (30) day notice provision for a change in the community’s fee structure;

Minimum thirty (30) day move-out notice provision for resident nonpayment, subject to applicable landlord or tenant laws;

Provisions for assisting any resident that has received a move-out notice to find appropriate living arrangements prior to the actual move-out date;

Refund and cancellation policies;

Description of any special programming, staffing, or training if an assisted living community is marketed as providing special programming, staffing, or training on behalf of residents with particular needs or conditions;

Other community rights, policies, practices, and procedures;

Other resident rights and responsibilities, including compliance with subsections (3) and (4) of Section 3 of this Act; and

Grievance policies that minimally address issues related to confidentiality of complaints and the process for resolving grievances between the resident and the assisted living community.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 141, § 7, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 36, § 7, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 20, § 7.